Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1751.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


That act shall be known and may be cited as the “Human


Trafficking Identification and Reporting Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 20M of Title 74, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For the purposes of this section:


1. “Administering organization” means a nonprofit organization


that is experienced in human trafficking prevention and victim



Req. No. 3070 Page 1


support and has developed or administers a digital identification


and reporting platform;


2. “Digital identification and reporting platform” means a


secure, trauma-informed, HIPAA-compliant technology platform that:


a. provides multichannel access for the public and


professionals, including mobile applications, web


portals, short messaging services, and voice or live


chats,


b. guides users through structured questions to identify


indicators of human trafficking and enables users to


upload supporting evidence,


c. allows reporters to remain anonymous and exercises


consent-based controls over personally identifiable


information,


d. utilizes an artificial intelligence assisted risk


model or similar decision support system to triage


reports based on severity and credibility and pushes


notifications to authorized investigative agencies,


e. routes high priority reports in real time to the


appropriate law enforcement agency, child protection


agency, or vetted service provider based on


jurisdiction,





Req. No. 3070 Page 2


f. provides secure dashboards for authorized agencies to


view, manage, and respond to reports with role-based


access controls and audit logging,


g. is interoperable with the National Human Trafficking


Hotline, state child welfare systems, law enforcement


case management systems, and other relevant platforms


through standardized application programming


interfaces, and


h. complies with all applicable federal and state privacy


laws, including the federal Health Insurance


Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA) and


the Criminal Justice Information Services security


policy;


3. “Field coordinator” means an individual employed by or under


contract with an administering organization and who serves under the


statewide coordinator to assist with regional training, outreach,


and implementation. Such individual shall not be a state employee


and shall not be hired, compensated, or granted benefits through


state employment systems;


4. “Human trafficking” means modern-day slavery that includes,


but is not limited to, extreme exploitation and the denial of


freedom or liberty of an individual for purposes of deriving benefit


from that individual’s commercial sex act or labor. It includes


human trafficking for labor and human trafficking for commercial sex

Req. No. 3070 Page 3


as such terms are defined in Section 748 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


5. “Mandated reporter” means any individual who is required by


law to report suspected abuse, exploitation, or human trafficking of


a minor or vulnerable person, including, but not limited to, a


teacher, health care professional, law enforcement personnel, and


social worker; and


6. “Statewide coordinator” means an individual employed by or


under contract with an administering organization and who is


approved by the Attorney General to oversee implementation of the


digital identification and reporting platform, coordinate training


and outreach, and serve as a liaison among state agencies and the


administering organization. Such person shall not be a state


employee and shall not be hired, compensated, or granted benefits


through state employment systems.


B. 1. The Office of the Attorney General shall enter into a


contract with an administering organization to adopt or designate a


digital identification and reporting platform.


2. The Office of the Attorney General, in consultation with the


administering organization and relevant state agencies, shall


certify one or more digital identification and reporting platforms.


C. Mandated reporters may utilize the digital identification


and reporting platform certified by the Office of the Attorney


General as the primary mechanism for reporting suspected human

Req. No. 3070 Page 4


trafficking. Such platform shall facilitate referral to the


National Human Trafficking Hotline for crisis support as necessary.


The provisions of this subsection shall not preclude a mandated


reporter from utilizing the National Human Trafficking Hotline or


other mandated reporting channels.


D. The digital identification and reporting platform certified


by the Office of the Attorney General shall send notifications of


high priority reports to designated law enforcement and child


protection officials and shall provide a secure dashboard for


authorized personnel to view, triage, and respond to reports. The


platform shall support real-time communication between investigators


and survivors or reporters with consent.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3070 CN 1/14/2026 2:49:13 PM



















Req. No. 3070 Page 5